Washington statutes.
RCW 36.37.100

Poultry shows—Open to public—Admission charge.

All poultry shows shall be open to the public. Such admission charge may be made as is authorized by the board of county commissioners.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.37.100. Prior: 1929 c 109 s 2; RRS s 2755-2.]